Indiana, session 2026, HB1247.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-26-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2024,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 18. (a) Subject to subsection (m), an operator
to which the association provides a notice of intent under section 16 of
this chapter shall comply with subsection (b) not later than:
(1) 7 a.m. prevailing time on the next working day that follows the
elapse of two (2) full working days after the operator receives the
notice of intent; or
(2) the starting date and time of the excavation or demolition
stated in the notice of intent;
whichever is later.
(b) Subject to subsection (m), an operator to which the association
provides a notice of intent under section 16 of this chapter shall do the
following:
(1) Supply to the person responsible for the excavation or
2026 IN 1247—LS 6897/DI 101


demolition the following information:
(A) The approximate location and a description of all the
operator's underground facilities that may be damaged as a
result of the excavation or demolition.
(B) The location and description of all facility markers
indicating the approximate location of the underground
facilities.
(C) Any other information that would assist that person in
locating and avoiding damage to the underground facilities,
including providing adequate temporary markings indicating
the approximate location of the underground facility and
locations where permanent facility markers do not exist.
(2) Provide to the association an electronic positive response.
(c) An operator that receives a notice of intent under section 16 of
this chapter and that has underground facilities in the location of the
proposed excavation or demolition shall provide an electronic positive
response to the association, in the manner prescribed by the
association, when the operator has provided the marking information
required by this chapter. The association shall provide an operator's
electronic positive response under this subsection to the person
responsible for the excavation or demolition.
(d) An operator to which the association provides notice under
section 16.5 of this chapter of preliminary engineering studies or
construction planning activities shall, not later than 7 a.m. prevailing
time on the next working day that follows the elapse of ten (10) full
working days after the operator receives the notice, do the following:
(1) Do one (1) or more of the following, in accordance with
section 16.5(e) of this chapter:
(A) Provide to the person serving the design information
notice the approximate location and a description of all the
operator's underground facilities that are located in the project
area that will be affected by the proposed excavation or
demolition.
(B) Allow:
(i) the person serving the design information notice; or
(ii) another authorized person;
to inspect, at a location that is acceptable to the operator,
drawings or other records for all of the operator's underground
facilities within the project area that will be affected by the
proposed excavation or demolition.
(C) Designate with temporary facility markers the location of
all of the operator's underground facilities within the project
2026 IN 1247—LS 6897/DI 101


area that will be affected by the proposed excavation or
demolition, as identified in the design information notice.
(2) Using maps when appropriate, provide to the person serving
the design information notice the location and a description of all
facility markers indicating the approximate location of the
underground facilities, if applicable.
(3) Using maps when appropriate, provide to the person serving
the design information notice any other information that would
assist a person in locating the underground facilities during the
engineering studies or construction planning activities.
(4) Provide an electronic positive response to the association.
(e) Facility locate markings must consist of paint, flags, or stakes or
any combination that mark the approximate location of the
underground facilities. The method of marking must be appropriate for
the location of the underground facilities.
(f) Color coding of facility locate markings indicating the type of
underground facility must conform to the following color coding:
Facility and Type of Product Specific Group
Identifying Color
(1) Electric power distribution
and transmission Safety red
(2) Municipal electric systems Safety red
(3) Gas distribution and
transmission High visibility
safety yellow
(4) Oil distribution and
transmission High visibility
safety yellow
(5) Dangerous materials, product
lines, steam lines High visibility
safety yellow
(6) Communications service
systems Safety alert orange
(7) Cable television Safety alert orange
(8) Police and fire
communications Safety alert orange
(9) Water systems Safety precaution blue
(10) Sewer systems Safety green
(11) Proposed excavation White
(g) An operator to which the association provides a notice of intent
under section 16 of this chapter and that has no underground facilities
in the location of the proposed excavation or demolition shall, not later
2026 IN 1247—LS 6897/DI 101


than:
(1) 7 a.m. prevailing time on the next working day that follows the
elapse of two (2) full working days after the operator receives the
notice of intent; or
(2) the starting date and time of the excavation or demolition
stated in the notice of intent;
whichever is later, provide an electronic positive response to the
association indicating that the operator has no underground facilities
in the location of the proposed excavation or demolition. The
association shall provide the operator's electronic positive response to
the person responsible for the excavation or demolition.
(h) An operator to which the association provides notice under
section 16.5 of this chapter of preliminary engineering studies or
construction planning activities and that has no underground facilities
located in the project area that will be affected by the proposed
excavation or demolition shall, not later than 7 a.m. prevailing time on
the next working day that follows the elapse of ten (10) full working
days after the operator receives the notice, provide an electronic
positive response to the association indicating that the operator has no
underground facilities located in the project area that will be affected
by the proposed excavation or demolition. The association shall
provide the operator's electronic positive response to the person that
served the design information notice.
(i) This section does not apply to an operator making an emergency
repair to its own underground facility.
(j) This subsection applies if all of the following occur:
(1) An operator of a pipeline facility is required to supply
information, including facility locate markings, under subsection
(b) to a person responsible for an excavation or demolition.
(2) The operator of the pipeline facility fails to supply the:
(A) information, including facility locate markings, under
subsection (b) to a person responsible for an excavation or
demolition; or
(B) electronic positive response to the association under
subsection (c).
(3) The operator's pipeline facility is damaged during the
excavation or demolition for which the operator was required to
supply the information described in subdivision (1).
The operator of the pipeline facility may be subject to a civil penalty in
an amount recommended by the advisory committee and approved by
the commission, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(k) Subsection (j) does not apply to an operator that:
2026 IN 1247—LS 6897/DI 101


(1) is repairing its own underground facilities; or
(2) fails to supply required information or provide facility locate
markings due to factors beyond the control of the operator.
(l) A person that knowingly moves, removes, damages, or otherwise
alters a facility locate marking supplied under this section may be
subject to a civil penalty in an amount recommended by the advisory
committee and approved by the commission, not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000). This subsection does not apply to a person
that moves, removes, damages, or otherwise alters a facility locate
marking as part of the excavation or demolition for which the facility
locate markings were supplied.
(m) If an operator receives, under section 16 of this chapter, notice
of an excavation or demolition and determines that the operator is
unable to do either or both of the following, the operator shall notify
the person responsible for the excavation or demolition of the
operator's determination and shall provide additional information and,
if requested, onsite assistance to the person responsible for the
excavation or demolition:
(1) Locate and mark the operator's affected underground facilities
in the time required by subsection (a).
(2) Mark the approximate location of the operator's affected
underground facilities.
Upon receiving a notice under this subsection, the person
responsible for the excavation or demolition may engage the
services of a third party utility locator in the manner set forth in
subsection (p).
(n) A person responsible for an excavation or demolition shall,
before commencing the excavation or demolition, provide an
affirmative response to the association, in the manner prescribed by the
association, acknowledging the person's receipt of the information
provided under subsections (c) and (g).
(o) An operator to which the association provides notice under
section 16 or 16.5 of this chapter shall provide to the association an
electronic positive response:
(1) in the manner prescribed by the association; and
(2) including relevant codes detailing work status;
acknowledging the operator's resolution of the notice. The association
shall promptly provide the operator's electronic positive response to the
person that served the notice under section 16 or 16.5 of this chapter.
(p) If an operator that receives a notice of intent under section
16 of this chapter after June 30, 2026, fails to:
(1) provide the person responsible for the excavation or
2026 IN 1247—LS 6897/DI 101


demolition the information required under subsection (b)(1)
within the time prescribed by subsection (a);
(2) provide the association an electronic positive response
under subsection (c);
(3) provide the association an electronic positive response
under subsection (g) within the time prescribed by subsection
(g), if applicable; or
(4) provide the person responsible for the excavation or
demolition the notice required under subsection (m), if
applicable;
the person responsible for the excavation or demolition may
engage the services of a third party utility locator to determine
whether the operator has underground facilities in the location of
the proposed excavation or demolition and, if applicable, provide
the marking information required by this chapter. If the person
responsible for the excavation or demolition elects to engage the
services of a third party utility locator under this subsection, the
person must select a third party utility locator that is authorized by
the operator under subsection (r) for that purpose.
(q) Upon a third party utility locator's completion of the
services for which the third party utility locator was engaged under
subsection (p), the person responsible for the excavation or
demolition shall provide an electronic positive response to the
association, in the manner prescribed by the association, of:
(1) the third party utility locator's completion of the services;
and
(2) the amount paid by the person to the third party utility
locator for the services.
The association may require the third party utility locator or the
person responsible for the excavation or demolition to provide an
invoice or other documentation verifying the amount set forth in
subdivision (2). The association shall provide an electronic positive
response submitted under this subsection to the operator on whose
behalf the services were performed under subsection (p). Upon
receipt of the electronic positive response from the association, the
operator shall submit, in the manner and within the time
prescribed by the association, payment in an amount equal to three
(3) times the amount set forth in subdivision (2) to the person
responsible for the excavation or demolition.
(r) Not later than June 1, 2026, each operator subject to this
chapter shall provide to the association a notice, in the manner
prescribed by the association, that authorizes one (1) or more third
2026 IN 1247—LS 6897/DI 101


party utility locators to provide the services described in subsection
(p) on the operator's behalf. Upon receiving the notices required by
this subsection, the association shall compile a listing of the
authorized third party utility locators for each operator subject to
this chapter. After June 30, 2026, upon receiving a notice of intent
under section 16 of this chapter, the association shall immediately
provide, in a manner determined by the association, the listing to
the person that submitted the notice of intent. The association shall
require each operator subject to this chapter to periodically update
or verify, according to a schedule and in a manner prescribed by
the association, the operator's authorized third party utility
locators under this subsection. The association shall develop and
adopt policies and procedures for:
(1) accepting, processing, compiling, and updating the
authorizations required by this subsection;
(2) verifying the amounts and satisfaction of payments under
subsection (q); and
(3) providing the listing required by this subsection to persons
submitting notices of intent under section 16 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1247—LS 6897/DI 101